Oklahoma, session 2025, SB437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-106, as

last amended by Section 5, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.

2024, Section 6-106), is amended to read as follows:

Section 6-106. A. 1. Every application for a driver license

or identification card shall be made by the applicant upon a form

furnished by Service Oklahoma.

2. Every original, renewal, or replacement application for a

driver license or identification card made by a male applicant who

is at least sixteen (16) but less than twenty-six (26) years of age

shall include a statement that by submitting the application, the

applicant is consenting to registration with the Selective Service

Req. No. 810 Page 1

Syst em. The pertinent information from the application shall be

forwarded by Service Oklahoma to the Data Management Center of the

Selective Service System in order to register the applicant as

required by law with the Selective Service System. Any applicant

refusing to sign the consent statement shall be denied a driver

license or identification card.

3. Except as provided for in subsections G and H of this

section, every applicant for a driver license or identification card

shall provide to Service Oklahoma at the time of application a

document showing proof of identity. Service Oklahoma shall

promulgate rules prescribing forms of identification acceptable for

an original Oklahoma driver license.

B. Every applicant for a driver license shall provide the

following information:

1. Full name;

2. Date of birth;

3. Sex;

4. Address of principal residence and county of such residence

which shall be referenced on the REAL ID Compliant Driver License or

Identification Card; proof of principal residency, as prescribed by

rules promulgated by Service Oklahoma, documenting provided address;

5. Current and complete mailing address to be maintained by

Service Oklahoma for the purpose of giving notice, if necessary, as

required by Section 2-116 of this title;

Req. No. 810 Page 2

6. Medical information, as determined by the Department Service

Oklahoma, which shall assure Service Oklahoma that the person is not

prohibited from being licensed as provided by paragraph 7 of

subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;

7. Whether the applicant is deaf or hard-of-hearing;

8. A brief description of the applicant, as determined by the

Department Service Oklahoma;

9. Whether the applicant has previously been licensed, and, if

so, when and by what state or country, and whether any license has

ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an application has ever

been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension,

revocation or refusal;

10. Whether the applicant is an alien eligible to be considered

for licensure and is not prohibited from licensure pursuant to

paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;

11. Whether the applicant has:

a. previously been licensed and, if so, when and by what

state or country, and

b. held more than one license at the same time during the

immediately preceding ten (10) years; and

12. Social Security number.

No person shall request Service Oklahoma to use the Social Security

number of that person as the driver license number. Upon renewal or

replacement of any driver license issued after the effective date of

Req. No. 810 Page 3

this act July 1, 2001, the licensee shall advise Service Oklahoma or

the licensed operator if the present driver license number of the

licensee is the Social Security number of the licensee. If the

driver license number is the Social Security number, Service

Oklahoma or the licensed operator shall change the driver license

number to a computer-generated alphanumeric identification.

C. 1. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B

of this section, every applicant for a commercial driver license who

is subject to the requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part 391, and is

applying for an original, renewal, or replacement license, and every

person who, upon or after May 8, 2012, is currently the holder of a

commercial driver license and is subject to the requirements of 49

C.F.R., Part 391, and who does not apply for a renewal or

replacement license prior to January 30, 2014, shall submit to

Service Oklahoma and maintain with Service Oklahoma a current

approved medical examination certificate signed by a licensed

physician authorized to perform and approve medical examination

certifications. Service Oklahoma shall adopt rules for maintaining

medical examination certificates pursuant to the requirements in 49

C.F.R., Parts 383 and 384. Any commercial driver licensee subject

to the requirements of this paragraph who fails to maintain on file

with Service Oklahoma a current, approved medical examination

certificate shall have the driving privileges of the person

downgraded to a Class D driver license by Service Oklahoma.

Req. No. 810 Page 4

2. If the applicant is applying for an original commercial

driver license in Oklahoma or is transferring a commercial driver

license from another state to Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall

review the driving record of the applicant in other states for the

immediately preceding ten (10) years, unless the record review has

already been performed by Service Oklahoma. As a result of the

review, if it is determined by Service Oklahoma that the applicant

is subject to a period of disqualification as prescribed by Section

6-205.2 of this title which has not yet been imposed, Service

Oklahoma shall impose the period of disqualification and the

applicant shall serve the period of disqualification before a

commercial driver license is issued to the applicant; provided,

nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent the issuance

of a Class D driver license to the applicant.

3. If the applicant has or is applying for a hazardous material

endorsement, the applicant shall submit to a security threat

assessment performed by the Transportation Security Administration

of the United States Department of Homeland Security as required by

and pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 1572, which shall be used to

determine whether the applicant is eligible for the endorsement

pursuant to federal law and regulation.

4. Service Oklahoma shall notify each commercial driving school

of the passage of this section, and each commercial driving school



Req. No. 810 Page 5

shal l notify prospective students of its school of the hazardous

material endorsement requirement.

D. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B of

this section, every applicant shall be given an option on the

application for issuance of a driver license or identification card

or renewal pursuant to Section 6-115 of this title to provide an

emergency contact person. The emergency contact information

requested may include full name, address, and phone number. The

emergency contact information shall be maintained by Service

Oklahoma and shall be used by Service Oklahoma and law enforcement

for emergency purposes only. A person listed as an emergency

contact may request to be removed at any time. Any update to a

change of name, address, or phone number may be made by the

applicant listing the emergency contact person or by the person

listed as the emergency contact.

E. Whenever application is received from a person previously

licensed in another jurisdiction, Service Oklahoma shall request a

copy of the driving record from the other jurisdiction and,

effective September 1, 2005, from all other jurisdictions in which

the person was licensed within the immediately previous ten (10)

years. When received, the driving record shall become a part of the

driving record of the person in this state with the same force and

effect as though entered on the driver’s record in this state in the

original instance.

Req. No. 810 Page 6

F. Whenever Service Oklahoma receives a request for a driving

record from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be

forwarded without charge.

G. A person shall not apply for or possess more than one state-

issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or

Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of

this title. A valid and unexpired Oklahoma driver license shall

serve as both primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever

application for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card is

submitted to Service Oklahoma. The provisions of subsection B of

Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply

when issuing an identification card pursuant to the provisions of

this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary

to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.

H. A valid and unexpired U.S. passport shall serve as both

primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever application for a

driver license or identification card is submitted to the Department

Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary

to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.

I. An original or certified copy of the applicant’s birth

certificate filed with the Division of Vital Records within the

State Department of Health or equivalent agency in the applicant’s

state of birth shall serve as a primary proof of identity whenever

application for a driver license or identification card is submitted

Req. No. 810 Page 7

to S ervice Oklahoma. No birth certificate issued by a county of

this state or any other state shall be accepted as a primary proof

of identity. Any employee of Service Oklahoma who accepts a birth

certificate issued by a county as a primary proof of identity shall

be suspended for thirty (30) days without pay on the first instance

and lose his or her employment on the second instance. Any employee

of Service Oklahoma who verbally or in writing instructs another

employee to accept a birth certificate issued by a county as a

primary proof of identity shall lose his or her employment.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-810 MSBB 1/14/2025 3:51:25 PM

























Req. No. 810 Page 8